Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 13
PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT - MUNICIPAL CONTRACTS

31-25-1301. Short title.

This part 13 shall be known and may be cited as the "Integrated Delivery Method for Municipal Public Improvements Act".

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1814, § 3, effective August 3.

31-25-1302. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is the policy of the state of Colorado to encourage public contracting procedures that encourage competition, openness, and impartiality to the maximum extent possible.

Competition exists not only in the costs of goods and services, but in the technical competence of the providers and suppliers in their ability to make timely completion and delivery and in the quality and performance of their products and services.

Timely and effective completion of public projects can be achieved through a variety of methods when procuring goods and services for public projects.

In enacting this part 13, the general assembly intends to establish for municipalities and agencies of municipalities an optional alternative public project delivery method.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1814, § 3, effective August 3.

31-25-1303. Definitions.

As used in this part 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agency" means any home rule or statutory city, town, territorial charter city, city and county, or any other political subdivision that a municipality may create pursuant to state law that is a budgetary unit exercising construction contracting authority or discretion.

"Contract" means any agreement for designing, building, altering, repairing, improving, demolishing, operating, maintaining, or financing a public project.

"Cost-reimbursement contract" means a contract under which a participating entity is reimbursed for costs that are allowable and allocable in accordance with the contract terms and provisions of this part 13.

"Integrated project delivery" or "IPD" means a project delivery method in which there is a contractual agreement between an agency and a single participating entity for the design, construction, alteration, operation, repair, improvement, demolition, maintenance, or financing, or any combination of these services, for a public project.

"IPD contract" means a contract using an integrated project delivery method.

"Participating entity" means a partnership, corporation, joint venture, unincorporated association, or other legal entity that provides appropriately licensed planning, architectural, engineering, development, construction, operating, or maintenance services as needed in connection with an IPD contract.

"Public project" means any lands, buildings, structures, works, machinery, equipment, or facilities suitable for and intended for use as public property for public purposes or suitable for and intended for use in the promotion of the public health, public welfare, or public education, to the extent the boundaries of an agency and a school district are coterminous, or for the conservation of natural resources, including the planning of any such lands, buildings, improvements, structures, works, machinery, equipment, or facilities. "Public project" shall also include existing lands, buildings, improvements, structures, works, and facilities, as well as improvements, renovations, or additions to any such lands, buildings, improvements, structures, works, or facilities and any operation or maintenance programs for the operation and upkeep of such projects.

"Public purposes" includes, but is not limited to, the supplying of public water services and facilities, public sewer services and facilities, and lands, buildings, improvements, equipment, and facilities for public education, to the extent the boundaries of the agency and the school district are coterminous.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1815, § 3, effective August 3.

31-25-1304. Integrated project delivery contracts - authorization - effect of other laws.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any agency may award an IPD contract for a public project under the provisions of this part 13 upon the determination by such agency that integrated project delivery represents a timely or cost-effective alternative for a public project.

Nothing in this part 13 shall be construed as exempting any agency or participating entity from applicable federal, state, or local laws, regulations, or ordinances governing labor relations, professional licensing, public contracting, or other related laws, except to the extent that an exemption is created under such legal authority or is granted by necessary implication from such legal authority.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1816, § 3, effective August 3.

31-25-1305. Integrated project delivery contracting process - prequalification of participating entities - apprentice training.

An agency may prequalify participating entities for an IPD contract by public notice of its request for qualifications prior to the date set forth in the notice. A request for qualifications may contain the following elements and such additional information as may be requested by the agency:

A general description of the proposed public project;

Relevant budget considerations;

Requirements of the participating entity, including:

If the participating entity is a partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, or other association, a listing of all of the partners, general partners, members, joint venturers, or association members known at the time of submission of qualifications;

Evidence that the participating entity, or the constituent entities or members thereof, has completed or has demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity, financial and otherwise, to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity;

Evidence that the proposed personnel of the participating entity have sufficient experience and training to completely manage and complete the proposed public project; and

Evidence of all applicable licenses, registrations, and credentials required to provide the proposed services for the public project, including but not limited to information on any revocation or suspension of any such license, registration, or credential.

The criteria for prequalification.

From the participating entities responding to the request for qualifications, the agency shall prepare and announce a short list of participating entities that it determines to be most qualified to receive a request for proposal.

Where an apprentice program as defined in section 8-15.7-101 (4) or certified by the office of apprenticeship in the employment and training administration in the United States department of labor exists in a county in which all or any portion of the municipality is located, or a comparable program for the training of apprentices is available in such county:

Each participating entity shall demonstrate to the agency that it has access to either the certified program or a comparable alternative; and

Each participating entity shall demonstrate that each of its subcontractors, at any tier, selected to perform work under a contract with a value of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or more has access to either the certified program or a comparable alternative.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1816, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2021:

IP(3) amended, (HB 21-1007), ch. 309, p. 1893, § 14, effective July 1.

31-25-1306. Requests for proposals - evaluation and award of integrated project delivery contracts.

An agency shall prepare and publish a request for proposals for each IPD contract that may contain the following elements and such other elements as may be requested by the agency:

The procedures to be followed for submitting proposals;

The criteria for evaluation of a proposal, which criteria may provide for selection of a proposal on a basis other than solely the lowest costs estimates submitted;

The procedures for making awards;

Required performance standards as defined by the participating entity;

A description of the drawings, specifications, or other submittals to be provided with the proposal, with guidance as to the form and the acceptable level of completion of the drawings, specifications, or submittals;

Relevant budget considerations or, for an IPD contract that includes operation or maintenance services, the life-cycle cost analysis for the contract;

The proposed project scheduling; and

The stipend, if any, to be paid to participating entities responding to the request for proposals who appear on the agency's short list pursuant to section 31-25-1305 (2) but whose proposals are not selected for award of the IPD contract.

After obtaining and evaluating proposals according to the criteria and procedures set forth in the request for proposals in accordance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, an agency may accept the proposal that, in its estimation, represents the best value to the agency. Acceptance of a proposal shall be by written notice to the participating entity that submitted the accepted proposal.

With respect to performance under each IPD contract, the participating entity shall comply with all laws applicable to public projects.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a participating entity selected for award of an IPD contract is not required to be licensed or registered to provide professional services as defined in section 24-30-1402 (6), C.R.S., if the person or firm actually performing any such professional services on behalf of the participating entity is appropriately licensed or registered and if the participating entity otherwise complies with applicable state licensing laws and requirements related to such professional services.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1817, § 3, effective August 3.

31-25-1307. Supplemental provisions.

The governing body of an agency may establish supplemental provisions that are designed to implement the provisions of this part 13.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1818, § 3, effective August 3.